Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-356
Mentally ill persons; mistreatment; liability; penalty.

Any person taking care of a mentally ill person, and restraining such a person, either with or without authority, who shall treat such person with wanton severity, harshness or cruelty, or shall in any way abuse such a person, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor and shall also be liable in an action for all damages sustained by such mentally ill person.

G.S.1873, c. 31, § 34, p. 418;

R.S.1913, § 7261;

C.S.1922, § 6918;

C.S.1929, § 83-723;

R.S.1943, § 83-356;

Laws 1947, c. 335, § 43, p. 1074;

Laws 1959, c. 442, § 9, p. 1490;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 312.

This section does not create a criminal offense for lack of a penalty. Redding v. State, 165 Neb. 307, 85 N.W.2d 647 (1957).